Utah statutes.
57-8-19.   Liens against units -- Removal from lien -- Effect of part payment.

(1) Subsequent to recording the declaration as provided in this act, and while the property remains subject to this act, no lien shall thereafter arise or be effective against the property. During such period liens or encumbrances shall arise or be created only against each unit and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant to such unit in the same manner and under the same conditions in every respect as liens or encumbrances may arise or be created upon or against any other separate parcel of real property subject to individual ownership; provided that no labor performed or materials furnished with the consent or at the request of a unit owner or his agent or his contractor or subcontractor shall be the basis for the filing of a lien pursuant to the lien law against the unit of any other unit owner not expressly consenting to or requesting the same, except that such express consent shall be deemed to be given by the owner of any unit in the case of emergency repairs. Labor performed or materials furnished for the common areas and facilities, if authorized by the unit owners, the manager or management committee in accordance with this act, the declaration or bylaws or the house rules, shall be deemed to be performed or furnished with the express consent of each unit owner and shall be the basis for the filing of a lien pursuant to the lien law against each of the units.

(2)  In the event a lien against two or more units becomes effective, the unit owners of the separate units may remove their units and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant to such units from the lien by payment of the fractional or proportional amount attributable to each of the units affected. Such individual payment shall be computed by reference to the percentages appearing in the declaration. Subsequent to any payment, discharge or other satisfaction, the unit and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant thereto shall be free and clear of the lien so paid, satisfied or discharged. Partial payment, satisfaction or discharge shall not prevent the lienor from proceeding to enforce his rights against any unit and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appurtenant thereto not so paid, satisfied or discharged.

